Missouri, session 2026, HB2969.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 301.020, 301.032, 301.074, 301.132, 301.147, 301.190, 301.380,
301.443, 301.800, 307.350, 307.353, 307.355, 307.360, 307.365, 307.370, 307.375, 307.380,
307.385, 307.390, 307.402, 643.303, and 643.315, RSMo, are repealed and nineteen new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 301.020, 301.032, 301.074, 301.132,
301.147, 301.148, 301.190, 301.380, 301.443, 301.800, 307.350, 307.360, 307.365, 307.370,
307.375, 307.385, 307.390, 643.303, and 643.315, to read as follows:
301.020. 1. Every owner of a motor vehicle or trailer, which shall be operated or
driven upon the highways of this state, except as herein otherwise expressly provided, shall
annually file, by mail or otherwise, in the office of the director of revenue, an application for
registration on a blank to be furnished by the director of revenue for that purpose containing:
(1) A brief description of the motor vehicle or trailer to be registered, including the
name of the manufacturer, the vehicle identification number, the amount of motive power of
the motor vehicle, stated in figures of horsepower and whether the motor vehicle is to be
registered as a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in section 301.010;
(2) The name, the applicant's identification number and address of the owner of such
motor vehicle or trailer;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2969 2
(3) The gross weight of the vehicle and the desired load in pounds if the vehicle is a
commercial motor vehicle or trailer.
2. If the vehicle is a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in section
301.010 and if such vehicle is ten years of age or less and has less than one hundred fifty
thousand miles on the odometer, the director of revenue shall retain the odometer information
provided [in the vehicle inspection report] by the owner of the vehicle, and provide for
prompt access to such information, together with the vehicle identification number for the
motor vehicle to which such information pertains, for a period of ten years after the receipt of
such information. This section shall not apply unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of ownership was submitted after July
1, 1989; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a manufacturer's statement of origin.
3. If the vehicle is any motor vehicle other than a motor vehicle primarily for business
use, a recreational motor vehicle, motorcycle, motortricycle, autocycle, bus, or any
commercial motor vehicle licensed for over twelve thousand pounds and if such motor
vehicle is ten years of age or less and has less than one hundred fifty thousand miles on the
odometer, the director of revenue shall retain the odometer information provided [in the
vehicle inspection report] by the owner of the vehicle, and provide for prompt access to such
information, together with the vehicle identification number for the motor vehicle to which
such information pertains, for a period of ten years after the receipt of such information. This
subsection shall not apply unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of ownership was submitted after July
1, 1990; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a manufacturer's statement of origin.
4. If the vehicle qualifies as a reconstructed motor vehicle, motor change vehicle,
specially constructed motor vehicle, non-USA-std motor vehicle, as defined in section
301.010, or prior salvage as referenced in section 301.573, the owner or lienholder shall
surrender the certificate of ownership. The owner shall make an application for a new
certificate of ownership, pay the required title fee, and obtain the vehicle examination
certificate required pursuant to subsection 9 of section 301.190. If an insurance company
pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section 301.010 and the owner retains the
vehicle, as prior salvage, the vehicle shall only be required to meet the examination
requirements under subsection 10 of section 301.190. Notarized bills of sale along with a
copy of the front and back of the certificate of ownership for all major component parts
installed on the vehicle and invoices for all essential parts which are not defined as major
component parts shall accompany the application for a new certificate of ownership. If the
vehicle is a specially constructed motor vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, two pictures of

HB 2969 3
the vehicle shall be submitted with the application. If the vehicle is a kit vehicle, the
applicant shall submit the invoice and the manufacturer's statement of origin on the kit. If the
vehicle requires the issuance of a special number by the director of revenue or a replacement
vehicle identification number, the applicant shall submit the required application and
application fee. All applications required under this subsection shall be submitted with any
applicable taxes which may be due on the purchase of the vehicle or parts. The director of
revenue shall appropriately designate "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle", "Motor Change
Vehicle", "Non-USA-Std Motor Vehicle", or "Specially Constructed Motor Vehicle" on the
current and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership of such vehicle.
5. Every insurance company that pays a claim for repair of a motor vehicle which as
the result of such repairs becomes a reconstructed motor vehicle as defined in section 301.010
or that pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section 301.010 and the owner is
retaining the vehicle shall in writing notify the owner of the vehicle, and in a first party claim,
the lienholder if a lien is in effect, that he is required to surrender the certificate of ownership,
and the documents and fees required pursuant to subsection 4 of this section to obtain a prior
salvage motor vehicle certificate of ownership or documents and fees as otherwise required
by law to obtain a salvage certificate of ownership, from the director of revenue. The
insurance company shall within thirty days of the payment of such claims report to the
director of revenue the name and address of such owner, the year, make, model, vehicle
identification number, and license plate number of the vehicle, and the date of loss and
payment.
6. Anyone who fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall be guilty of
a class B misdemeanor.
7. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to promote a
blindness education, screening and treatment program. The director of revenue shall collect
the donations and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the blindness
education, screening and treatment program fund established in section 209.015. Moneys in
the blindness education, screening and treatment program fund shall be used solely for the
purposes established in section 209.015; except that the department of revenue shall retain no
more than one percent for its administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this subsection
is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for registration at the time of issuance or
renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the applicant presents the
completed application to the director whether the applicant is interested in making the one
dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
8. An applicant for registration may make a donation of an amount not less than one
dollar to promote an organ donor program. The director of revenue shall collect the donations
and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the organ donor program

HB 2969 4
fund as established in sections 194.297 to 194.304. Moneys in the organ donor fund shall be
used solely for the purposes established in sections 194.297 to 194.304, except that the
department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs. The
donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for
registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at
the time the applicant presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant
is interested in making a contribution not less than one dollar as prescribed in this subsection.
9. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to the Missouri
medal of honor recipients fund. The director of revenue shall collect the donations and
deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the Missouri medal of honor
recipients fund as established in section 226.925. Moneys in the medal of honor recipients
fund shall be used solely for the purposes established in section 226.925, except that the
department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs. The
donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for
registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at
100 the time the applicant presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant
101 is interested in making the one dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
102 10. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or any other law to the
103 contrary, a first offense for driving with expired registration may be removed from a
104 person's driver record if, within thirty days of the violation, the person:
105 (1) Renews the registration on the motor vehicle in accordance with this chapter;
106 and
107 (2) Submits a written request to the department of revenue driver license bureau
108 requesting the removal of the violation from the person's Missouri driver record.
301.032. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 301.030 and 301.035 to the
contrary, the director of revenue shall establish a system of registration of all fleet vehicles
owned or purchased by a fleet owner registered pursuant to this section. The director of
revenue shall prescribe the forms for such fleet registration and the forms and procedures for
the registration updates prescribed in this section. Any owner of ten or more motor vehicles
which must be registered in accordance with this chapter may register as a fleet owner. All
registered fleet owners may, at their option, register all motor vehicles included in the fleet on
a calendar year or biennial basis pursuant to this section in lieu of the registration periods
provided in sections 301.030, 301.035, and 301.147. The director shall issue an identification
number to each registered owner of fleet vehicles.
2. All fleet vehicles included in the fleet of a registered fleet owner shall be registered
during April of the corresponding year or on a prorated basis as provided in subsection 3 of
this section. Fees of all vehicles in the fleet to be registered on a calendar year basis or on a

HB 2969 5
biennial basis shall be payable not later than the last day of April of the corresponding year,
with two years' fees due for biennially-registered vehicles. [Notwithstanding the provisions
of section 307.355, an application for registration of a fleet vehicle must be accompanied by a
certificate of inspection and approval issued no more than one hundred twenty days prior to
the date of application.] The fees for vehicles added to the fleet which must be licensed at the
time of registration shall be payable at the time of registration, except that when such vehicle
is licensed between July first and September thirtieth the fee shall be three-fourths the annual
fee, when licensed between October first and December thirty-first the fee shall be one-half
the annual fee and when licensed on or after January first the fee shall be one-fourth the
annual fee. When biennial registration is sought for vehicles added to a fleet, an additional
year's annual fee will be added to the partial year's prorated fee.
3. At any time during the calendar year in which an owner of a fleet purchases or
otherwise acquires a vehicle which is to be added to the fleet or transfers plates to a fleet
vehicle, the owner shall present to the director of revenue the identification number as a fleet
number and may register the vehicle for the partial year as provided in subsection 2 of this
section. The fleet owner shall also be charged a transfer fee of two dollars for each vehicle so
transferred pursuant to this subsection.
4. Except as specifically provided in this subsection, all fleet vehicles registered
pursuant to this section shall be issued a special license plate which shall have the words
"Fleet Vehicle" in place of the words "Show-Me State" in the manner prescribed by the
advisory committee established in section 301.129. Alternatively, for a one-time additional
five dollar per-vehicle fee beyond the regular registration fee, a fleet owner of at least fifty
fleet vehicles may apply for fleet license plates bearing a company name or logo, the size and
design thereof subject to approval by the director. All fleet license plates shall be made with
fully reflective material with a common color scheme and design, shall be clearly visible at
night, and shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed by section 301.130. Fleet vehicles
shall be issued multiyear license plates as provided in this section which shall not require
issuance of a renewal tab. Upon payment of appropriate registration fees, the director of
revenue shall issue a registration certificate or other suitable evidence of payment of the
annual or biennial fee, and such evidence of payment shall be carried at all times in the
vehicle for which it is issued.
5. [Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 307.350 to 307.390 to the contrary, a
fleet vehicle registered in Missouri is exempt from the requirements of sections 307.350 to
307.390 if at the time of the annual fleet registration, such fleet vehicle is situated outside the
state of Missouri.
6.] (1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, any person,
company, or corporation engaged in the business of renting or leasing three thousand five

HB 2969 6
hundred or more motor vehicles which are to be used exclusively for rental or leasing
purposes and not for resale that has applied to the director of revenue for authority to operate
as a lease or rental company as prescribed in section 144.070 may operate as a registered fleet
owner as prescribed in the provisions of this subsection to subsection [10] 9 of this section.
(2) The director of revenue may issue license plates after presentment of an
application, as designed by the director, and payment of an annual fee of three hundred sixty
dollars for the first ten plates and thirty-six dollars for each additional plate. The payment and
issuance of such plates shall be in lieu of registering each motor vehicle with the director as
otherwise provided by law.
(3) The registration fees for vehicles in the registered fleet owner's fleet shall be fully
payable at the time such plates are ordered, except that when such plate is ordered after the
first month of registration, the fees payable shall be prorated by the month the plates were
ordered. When biennial registration is sought, an additional year's annual fee shall be added
to the partial year's prorated fee.
(4) Such motor vehicles within the fleet shall not be exempted from the [safety
inspection and] emissions inspection provisions as prescribed in [chapters 307 and] chapter
643, but [notwithstanding the provisions of section 307.355,] such inspections shall not be
required to be presented to the director of revenue.
[7.] 6. A recipient of a lease or rental company license issued by the director of
revenue as prescribed in section 144.070 operating as a registered fleet owner under this
section shall register such fleet with the director of revenue on an annual or biennial basis in
lieu of the individual motor vehicle registration periods as prescribed in sections 301.030,
301.035, and 301.147. If an applicant elects a biennial fleet registration, the annual fleet
license plate fees prescribed in subdivision (1) of subsection [6] 5 of this section shall be
doubled. An agent fee as prescribed in subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 136.055
shall apply to the issuance of fleet registrations issued under subsections [6 to 10] 5 to 9 of
this section, and if a biennial fleet registration is elected, the agent fee shall be collected in an
amount equal to the fee for two years.
[8.] 7. Prior to the issuance of fleet license plates under subsections [6 to 10] 5 to 9 of
this section, the applicant shall provide proof of insurance as required under section 303.024
or 303.026.
[9.] 8. The authority of a recipient of a lease or rental company license issued by the
director of revenue as prescribed in section 144.070 to operate as a fleet owner as provided in
this section shall expire on January first of the licensure period.
[10.] 9. A lease or rental company operating fleet license plates issued under
subsections [6 to 10] 5 to 9 of this section shall make available, upon request, to the director

HB 2969 7
of revenue and all Missouri law enforcement agencies any corresponding vehicle and
registration information that may be requested as prescribed by rule.
[11.] 10. The director shall make all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section and shall design all necessary forms required by this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section
and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
under chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2019, shall be invalid and void.
301.074. License plates issued under sections 301.071 to 301.075 shall be valid for
the duration of the veteran's disability. Each such applicant issued license plates under these
provisions shall annually furnish [proof of vehicle inspection and] proof of disability to the
director, except that an applicant whose service connected disability qualifying him for
special license plates consists in whole or in part of loss of an eye or a limb or an applicant
with a one hundred percent permanent disability, as established by a physician's signed
statement to that effect, need only furnish proof of disability to the director when initially
applying for the special license plates and not thereafter, but in such case proof that the
veteran is alive shall be required annually. No commercial motor vehicle in excess of twenty-
four thousand pounds gross weight may be licensed under the provisions of sections 301.071
to 301.075.
301.132. 1. For purposes of this section, "street rod" is a vehicle older than 1949 or a
vehicle manufactured after 1948 to resemble a vehicle manufactured before 1949; and has
been altered from the manufacturer's original design or has a body constructed from
nonoriginal materials.
2. The model year and the year of manufacture that are listed on the certificate of title
of a street rod vehicle shall be the model year and year of manufacture that the body of such
vehicle resembles. The current and all subsequent certificates of ownership shall be
designated with the word "REPLICA".
3. For each street rod, there shall be an annual fee equal to the fee charged for
personalized license plates in section 301.144 in addition to the regular annual registration
fees.
4. In applying for registration of a street rod pursuant to this section, the owner of the
street rod shall submit with the application a certification that the vehicle for which the
application is made:

HB 2969 8
(1) Will be maintained for occasional transportation, exhibitions, club activities,
parades, tours, and similar uses;
(2) Will not be used for general daily transportation.
5. [In addition to the certification required pursuant to subsection 4 of this section,
when applying for registration of a street rod, the new owner of the street rod shall provide
proof that the street rod passed a safety inspection in accordance with section 307.350 that
shall be approved by the department of public safety in consultation with the street rod
community in this state.
6.] On registration of a vehicle pursuant to this section, the director of the department
of revenue shall issue to the owner two license plates containing the number assigned to the
registration certificate issued by the director of revenue, and the following words: "STREET
ROD", "STATE OF MISSOURI". Such license plates shall be kept securely attached to the
motor vehicle registered pursuant to this section. The director of revenue shall determine the
characteristic features of such license plates for vehicles registered pursuant to the provisions
of this section so that they may be recognized as such, except that such license plates shall be
made with fully reflective material with a common color scheme and design, shall be clearly
visible at night, and shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed by section 301.130.
[7.] 6. Unless the presence of the equipment was specifically required by a statute of
this state as a condition of sale in the year listed as the year of manufacture on the certificate
of title, the presence of any specific equipment is not required for the operation of a vehicle
registered pursuant to this section.
[8. Except as provided in subsection 5 of this section,] 7. A vehicle registered
pursuant to this section is exempt from any statute of this state that requires [periodic vehicle
inspections and from any statute of this state that requires] the use and inspection of emission
controls.
[9.] 8. A "custom vehicle" means any motor vehicle that:
(1) Is at least twenty-five years old and of a model year after 1948, or was
manufactured to resemble a vehicle twenty-five years old or older and of a model year after
1948; and
(2) Has been altered from the manufacturer's original design, or has an entire body
constructed from nonoriginal materials.
[10.] 9. The model year and the year of manufacture that are listed on the certificate
of title of a custom vehicle shall be the model year and year of manufacture that the body of
such vehicle resembles. The current and all subsequent certificates of ownership shall be
designated with the word "REPLICA".

HB 2969 9
[11.] 10. For each custom vehicle, there shall be an annual fee equal to the fee
charged for personalized license plates in section 301.144 in addition to the regular annual
registration fees.
[12.] 11. In applying for registration of a custom vehicle pursuant to this section, the
owner of the custom vehicle shall submit with the application a certification that the vehicle
for which the application is made:
(1) Will be maintained for occasional transportation, exhibits, club activities, parades,
tours, and similar uses; and
(2) Will not be used for general daily transportation.
[13. In addition to the certification required pursuant to subsection 12 of this section,
when applying for registration of a custom vehicle, the new owner of the custom vehicle shall
provide proof that the custom vehicle passed a safety inspection in accordance with section
307.350 that shall be approved by the department of public safety in consultation with the
street rod community in this state.
14.] 12. On registration of a vehicle pursuant to this section, the director of the
department of revenue shall issue to the owner two license plates containing the number
assigned to the registration certificate issued by the director of revenue, and the following
words: "CUSTOM VEHICLE", "STATE OF MISSOURI". Such license plates shall be kept
securely attached to the motor vehicle registered hereunder. The director of revenue shall
determine the characteristic features of such license plates for vehicles registered pursuant to
the provisions of this section so that they may be recognized as such, except that such license
plates shall be made with fully reflective material with a common color scheme and design,
shall be clearly visible at night, and shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed by section
301.130.
[15.] 13. Unless the presence of the equipment was specifically required by a statute
of this state as a condition of sale in the year listed as the year of manufacture on the
certificate of title, the presence of any specific equipment is not required for the operation of a
vehicle registered pursuant to this section.
[16. Except as provided in subsection 13 of this section, A vehicle registered pursuant
to this section is exempt from any statute of this state that requires periodic vehicle
inspections and from any statute of this state that requires the use and inspection of emission
controls.
17.] 14. For purposes of this section, "blue dot tail light" is a red lamp installed in the
rear of a motor vehicle containing a blue or purple insert that is not more than one inch in
diameter.
[18.] 15. A street rod or custom vehicle may use blue dot tail lights for stop lamps,
rear turning indicator lamps, rear hazard lamps, and rear reflectors.

HB 2969 10
301.147. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 301.020 to the contrary,
beginning July 1, 2000, the director of revenue may provide owners of motor vehicles, other
than commercial motor vehicles licensed in excess of fifty-four thousand pounds gross
weight, the option of biennially registering motor vehicles. Any vehicle manufactured as an
even-numbered model year vehicle shall be renewed each even-numbered calendar year and
any such vehicle manufactured as an odd-numbered model year vehicle shall be renewed each
odd-numbered calendar year, subject to the following requirements:
(1) The fee collected at the time of biennial registration shall include the annual
registration fee plus a pro rata amount for the additional twelve months of the biennial
registration;
(2) Presentation of all documentation otherwise required by law for vehicle
registration including, but not limited to, a personal property tax receipt or certified statement
for the preceding year that no such taxes were due as set forth in section 301.025, proof of [a
motor vehicle safety inspection and] any applicable emission inspection conducted within
sixty days prior to the date of application and proof of insurance as required by section
303.026.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 301.020 to the contrary, beginning
January 1, 2027, the director of revenue may provide owners of motor vehicles, other
than commercial motor vehicles licensed in excess of fifty-four thousand pounds gross
weight, the additional options of three-year and five-year motor vehicle registrations,
subject to the following requirements:
(1) For three-year registrations, the fee collected at the time of registration shall
include the annual registration fee plus a pro rata amount for the additional twenty-four
months of the three-year registration; and
(2) For five-year registrations, the fee collected at the time of registration shall
include the annual registration fee plus a pro rata amount for the additional forty-eight
months of the five-year registration.
3. Applicants for three-year and five-year registrations shall be required to
present all documentation otherwise required by law for vehicle registration including,
but not limited to, a personal property tax receipt or certified statement for the
preceding year that no such taxes were due as set forth in section 301.025 and proof of
insurance as required under section 303.026.
4. The director of revenue may prescribe rules and regulations for the effective
administration of this section. The director is authorized to adopt those rules that are
reasonable and necessary to accomplish the limited duties specifically delegated within this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
promulgated pursuant to the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if

HB 2969 11
it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after [July 1, 2000] August 28, 2025, shall be invalid and void.
[3.] 5. The director of revenue shall have the authority to stagger the registration
period of motor vehicles other than commercial motor vehicles licensed in excess of twelve
thousand pounds gross weight. Once the owner of a motor vehicle chooses the option of
biennial, three-year, or five-year registration, such registration must be maintained for the
full twenty-four month, thirty-six month, or sixty-month period.
301.148. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, motor vehicles
eligible for registration under this chapter may, at the option of the registrant, be
registered permanently upon the payment of ten times the applicable fees required to
register the vehicle annually and presentation of all documentation otherwise required
by law to register the vehicle annually.
2. The permanent plate or plates and registration fees shall be vehicle specific.
The plate or plates and the registration fees paid shall be nontransferable and
nonrefundable, except those covered under the provisions of section 301.442. Upon the
transfer of the title to any vehicle registered in accordance with this section, the
registration shall be canceled and the license plate issued therefore shall be returned to
the department of revenue.
3. As used in this section, the term "fees" means:
(1) Fees for registering the vehicle in accordance with this chapter;
(2) Emblem-use authorization fees, contributions, or donations as specified in
this chapter for the issuance of special license plates, which shall be paid to the
organization issuing the emblem-use authorization statement for the plate or plates
unless otherwise specified by law; and
(3) Fees collected as compensation for department of revenue fee offices under
section 136.055, which shall be paid to the fee office. Fee offices are hereby authorized
to collect a fee as compensation in full and for all services rendered on the basis specified
in this section.
4. The department of revenue may issue a distinctive registration tab or tabs
indicating a vehicle has been permanently registered as specified in this section.
5. The director of revenue may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations
for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of

HB 2969 12
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
301.190. 1. No certificate of registration of any motor vehicle or trailer, or number
plate therefor, shall be issued by the director of revenue unless the applicant therefor shall
make application for and be granted a certificate of ownership of such motor vehicle or trailer,
or shall present satisfactory evidence that such certificate has been previously issued to the
applicant for such motor vehicle or trailer. Application shall be made within thirty days after
the applicant acquires the motor vehicle or trailer, unless the motor vehicle was acquired
under section 301.213 or subsection 5 of section 301.210 in which case the applicant shall
make application within thirty days after receiving title from the dealer, upon a blank form
furnished by the director of revenue and shall contain the applicant's identification number, a
full description of the motor vehicle or trailer, the vehicle identification number, and the
mileage registered on the odometer at the time of transfer of ownership, as required by section
407.536, together with a statement of the applicant's source of title and of any liens or
encumbrances on the motor vehicle or trailer, provided that for good cause shown the director
of revenue may extend the period of time for making such application. When an owner wants
to add or delete a name or names on an application for certificate of ownership of a motor
vehicle or trailer that would cause it to be inconsistent with the name or names listed on the
notice of lien, the owner shall provide the director with documentation evidencing the
lienholder's authorization to add or delete a name or names on an application for certificate of
ownership.
2. The director of revenue shall use reasonable diligence in ascertaining whether the
facts stated in such application are true and shall, to the extent possible without substantially
delaying processing of the application, review any odometer information pertaining to such
motor vehicle that is accessible to the director of revenue. If satisfied that the applicant is the
lawful owner of such motor vehicle or trailer, or otherwise entitled to have the same
registered in his name, the director shall thereupon issue an appropriate certificate over his
signature and sealed with the seal of his office, procured and used for such purpose. The
certificate shall contain on its face a complete description, vehicle identification number, and
other evidence of identification of the motor vehicle or trailer, as the director of revenue may
deem necessary, together with the odometer information required to be put on the face of the
certificate pursuant to section 407.536, a statement of any liens or encumbrances which the
application may show to be thereon, and, if ownership of the vehicle has been transferred, the
name of the state issuing the transferor's title and whether the transferor's odometer mileage

HB 2969 13
statement executed pursuant to section 407.536 indicated that the true mileage is materially
different from the number of miles shown on the odometer, or is unknown.
3. The director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the current and all
subsequent issues of the certificate the words "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle", "Motor Change
Vehicle", "Specially Constructed Motor Vehicle", or "Non-USA-Std Motor Vehicle", as
defined in section 301.010. Effective July 1, 1990, on all original and all subsequent issues of
the certificate for motor vehicles as referenced in subsections 2 and 3 of section 301.020, the
director shall print on the face thereof the following designation: "Annual odometer updates
may be available from the department of revenue.". On any duplicate certificate, the director
of revenue shall reprint on the face thereof the most recent of either:
(1) The mileage information included on the face of the immediately prior certificate
and the date of purchase or issuance of the immediately prior certificate; or
(2) Any other mileage information provided to the director of revenue, and the date
the director obtained or recorded that information.
4. The certificate of ownership issued by the director of revenue shall be
manufactured in a manner to prohibit as nearly as possible the ability to alter, counterfeit,
duplicate, or forge such certificate without ready detection. In order to carry out the
requirements of this subsection, the director of revenue may contract with a nonprofit
scientific or educational institution specializing in the analysis of secure documents to
determine the most effective methods of rendering Missouri certificates of ownership
nonalterable or noncounterfeitable.
5. The fee for each original certificate so issued shall be eight dollars and fifty cents,
in addition to the fee for registration of such motor vehicle or trailer. If application for the
certificate is not made within thirty days after the vehicle is acquired by the applicant, or
where the motor vehicle was acquired under section 301.213 or subsection 5 of section
301.210 and the applicant fails to make application within thirty days after receiving title
from the dealer, a delinquency penalty fee of twenty-five dollars for the first thirty days of
delinquency and twenty-five dollars for each thirty days of delinquency thereafter, not to
exceed a total of two hundred dollars, but such penalty may be waived by the director for a
good cause shown. If the director of revenue learns that any person has failed to obtain a
certificate within thirty days after acquiring a motor vehicle or trailer, or where the motor
vehicle was acquired under section 301.213 or subsection 5 of section 301.210 and the
applicant fails to make application within thirty days after receiving title from the dealer, or
has sold a vehicle without obtaining a certificate, he shall cancel the registration of all
vehicles registered in the name of the person, either as sole owner or as a co-owner, and shall
notify the person that the cancellation will remain in force until the person pays the
delinquency penalty fee provided in this section, together with all fees, charges and payments

HB 2969 14
which the person should have paid in connection with the certificate of ownership and
registration of the vehicle. The certificate shall be good for the life of the motor vehicle or
trailer so long as the same is owned or held by the original holder of the certificate and shall
not have to be renewed annually.
6. Any applicant for a certificate of ownership requesting the department of revenue
to process an application for a certificate of ownership in an expeditious manner requiring
special handling shall pay a fee of five dollars in addition to the regular certificate of
ownership fee.
7. It is unlawful for any person to operate in this state a motor vehicle or trailer
required to be registered under the provisions of the law unless a certificate of ownership has
been applied for as provided in this section.
8. Before an original Missouri certificate of ownership is issued, an inspection of the
vehicle and a verification of vehicle identification numbers shall be made by the Missouri
state highway patrol on vehicles for which there is a current title issued by another state if a
Missouri salvage certificate of title has been issued for the same vehicle but no prior
inspection and verification has been made in this state, except that if such vehicle has been
inspected in another state by a law enforcement officer in a manner comparable to the
inspection process in this state and the vehicle identification numbers have been so verified,
the applicant shall not be liable for the twenty-five dollar inspection fee if such applicant
submits proof of inspection and vehicle identification number verification to the director of
revenue at the time of the application. The applicant, who has such a title for a vehicle on
which no prior inspection and verification have been made, shall pay a fee of twenty-five
dollars for such verification and inspection, payable to the director of revenue at the time of
the request for the application, which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of
the state highways and transportation department fund.
9. Each application for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for a vehicle
which is classified as a reconstructed motor vehicle, specially constructed motor vehicle, kit
vehicle, motor change vehicle, non-USA-std motor vehicle, or other vehicle as required by
the director of revenue shall be accompanied by a vehicle examination certificate issued by
the Missouri state highway patrol, or other law enforcement agency as authorized by the
100 director of revenue. The vehicle examination shall include a verification of vehicle
101 identification numbers and a determination of the classification of the vehicle. The owner of
102 a vehicle which requires a vehicle examination certificate shall present the vehicle for
103 examination and obtain a completed vehicle examination certificate prior to submitting an
104 application for a certificate of ownership to the director of revenue. Notwithstanding any
105 provision of the law to the contrary, an owner presenting a motor vehicle which has been
106 issued a salvage title and which is ten years of age or older to a vehicle examination described

HB 2969 15
107 in this subsection in order to obtain a certificate of ownership with the designation prior
108 salvage motor vehicle shall not be required to repair or restore the vehicle to its original
109 appearance in order to pass or complete the vehicle examination. The fee for the vehicle
110 examination application shall be twenty-five dollars and shall be collected by the director of
111 revenue at the time of the request for the application and shall be deposited in the state
112 treasury to the credit of the state highways and transportation department fund. If the vehicle
113 is also to be registered in Missouri, [the safety inspection required in chapter 307 and] the
114 emissions inspection required under chapter 643 shall be completed and the fees required by
115 section 307.365 and section 643.315 shall be charged to the owner.
116 10. When an application is made for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for
117 a motor vehicle previously registered or titled in a state other than Missouri [or as required by
118 section 301.020], it shall be accompanied by a current inspection form certified by a duly
119 authorized official inspection station as described in chapter 307. The completed form shall
120 certify that the manufacturer's identification number for the vehicle has been inspected, that it
121 is correctly displayed on the vehicle and shall certify the reading shown on the odometer at
122 the time of inspection. The inspection station shall collect the same fee as authorized in
123 section 307.365 for making the inspection, and the fee shall be deposited in the same manner
124 as provided in section 307.365. If the vehicle is also to be registered in Missouri, [the safety
125 inspection required in chapter 307 and] the emissions inspection required under chapter 643
126 shall be completed and only the fees required by section 307.365 and section 643.315 shall be
127 charged to the owner. This section shall not apply to vehicles being transferred on a
128 manufacturer's statement of origin.
129 11. Motor vehicles brought into this state in a wrecked or damaged condition or after
130 being towed as an abandoned vehicle pursuant to another state's abandoned motor vehicle
131 procedures shall, in lieu of the inspection required by subsection 10 of this section, be
132 inspected by the Missouri state highway patrol in accordance with subsection 9 of this
133 section. If the inspection reveals the vehicle to be in a salvage or junk condition, the director
134 shall so indicate on any Missouri certificate of ownership issued for such vehicle. Any
135 salvage designation shall be carried forward on all subsequently issued certificates of title for
136 the motor vehicle.
137 12. When an application is made for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for
138 a motor vehicle previously registered or titled in a state other than Missouri, and the
139 certificate of ownership has been appropriately designated by the issuing state as a
140 reconstructed motor vehicle, motor change vehicle, specially constructed motor vehicle, or
141 prior salvage vehicle, the director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the current
142 Missouri and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership the name of the issuing state
143 and such prior designation. The absence of any prior designation shall not relieve a transferor

HB 2969 16
144 of the duty to exercise due diligence with regard to such certificate of ownership prior to the
145 transfer of a certificate. If a transferor exercises any due diligence with regard to a certificate
146 of ownership, the legal transfer of a certificate of ownership without any designation that is
147 subsequently discovered to have or should have had a designation shall be a transfer free and
148 clear of any liabilities of the transferor associated with the missing designation.
149 13. When an application is made for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for
150 a motor vehicle previously registered or titled in a state other than Missouri, and the
151 certificate of ownership has been appropriately designated by the issuing state as non-USA-
152 std motor vehicle, the director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the current
153 Missouri and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership the words "Non-USA-Std
154 Motor Vehicle".
155 14. The director of revenue and the superintendent of the Missouri state highway
156 patrol shall make and enforce rules for the administration of the inspections required by this
157 section.
158 15. Each application for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for a vehicle
159 which is classified as a reconstructed motor vehicle, manufactured forty or more years prior
160 to the current model year, and which has a value of three thousand dollars or less shall be
161 accompanied by:
162 (1) A proper affidavit submitted by the owner explaining how the motor vehicle or
163 trailer was acquired and, if applicable, the reasons a valid certificate of ownership cannot be
164 furnished;
165 (2) Photocopies of receipts, bills of sale establishing ownership, or titles, and the
166 source of all major component parts used to rebuild the vehicle;
167 (3) A fee of one hundred fifty dollars in addition to the fees described in subsection 5
168 of this section. Such fee shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the state
169 highways and transportation department fund; and
170 (4) An inspection certificate, other than a motor vehicle examination certificate
171 required under subsection 9 of this section, completed and issued by the Missouri state
172 highway patrol, or other law enforcement agency as authorized by the director of revenue.
173 The inspection performed by the highway patrol or other authorized local law enforcement
174 agency shall include a check for stolen vehicles.
175
176 The department of revenue shall issue the owner a certificate of ownership designated with
177 the words "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle" and deliver such certificate of ownership in
178 accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Notwithstanding subsection 9 of this section,
179 no owner of a reconstructed motor vehicle described in this subsection shall be required to
180 obtain a vehicle examination certificate issued by the Missouri state highway patrol.

HB 2969 17
301.380. 1. Whenever the original, manufacturer's, or other distinguishing number on
any motor vehicle, trailer or motor vehicle tire has been destroyed, removed, covered, altered,
defaced or is otherwise nonexistent, the director of revenue, upon application, payment of a
fee of seven dollars and fifty cents, and satisfactory proof of ownership by the owner, shall
issue a certificate authorizing the owner to place a special number designated by the director
of revenue upon the vehicle, trailer or tire.
2. In order to properly calculate the sales tax due, in the case of a trailer which is
alleged to have been made by someone who is not a manufacturer using readily
distinguishable manufacturers' identifying numbers or a certificate of origin, the person
seeking the special number authorized by the provisions of this section shall secure a [written
statement from a motor vehicle inspection station] vehicle examination certificate issued by
the Missouri state highway patrol, or other law enforcement agency as authorized by the
director of revenue, that the trailer has been examined and that it is not one made by a
regular manufacturer. The superintendent of the state highway patrol shall provide such
forms for [inspection stations, and the person, firm, or corporation seeking the examination
shall pay a regular inspection fee for the examination. The proceeds of the fee shall be
distributed in the same manner as regular inspection fees are distributed] law enforcement
agencies performing such inspections. This subsection shall not apply to trailers inspected
under section 301.191.
3. The director of revenue shall designate the special numbers consecutively
beginning with the number one preceded by the letters "DR" and followed by the letters "Mo"
for each make of motor vehicle, trailer or motor vehicle tire, or if the make be unknown, the
number shall also be preceded by the letter "X".
4. When such number has been placed upon the motor vehicle or motor or engine
thereof, or trailer or motor vehicle tire, it shall be the lawful number of the same for the
purpose of identification, registration, and all other purposes of this chapter, and the owner
may sell and transfer such property under the special number. No person shall destroy,
remove, cover, alter or deface any such special number.
301.443. 1. Any legal resident of the state of Missouri who is a veteran of service in
the Armed Forces of the United States and has been honorably discharged from such service
and who is a former prisoner of war and any legal resident of the state of Missouri who is a
former prisoner of war and who was a United States citizen not in the Armed Forces of the
United States during such time is, upon filing an application for registration together with
such information and proof in the form of a statement from the United States Veterans
Administration or the Department of Defense or any other form of proof as the director may
require, entitled to receive annually one certificate of registration and one set of license plates
or other evidence of registration as provided in section 301.130 for a motor vehicle other than

HB 2969 18
a commercial motor vehicle licensed in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds gross weight.
There shall be no fee charged for license plates issued under the provisions of this section.
2. Not more than one certificate of registration and one corresponding set of motor
vehicle license plates or other evidence of registration as provided in section 301.130 shall be
issued each year to a qualified former prisoner of war under this section.
3. Proof of ownership [and vehicle inspection] of the particular motor vehicle for
which a registration certificate and set of license plates is requested must be shown at the time
of application. Proof of status as a former prisoner of war as required in subsection 1 of this
section shall only be required on the initial application.
4. As used in this section, "former prisoner of war" means any person who was taken
as an enemy prisoner during World War I, World War II, the Korean Conflict, or the Vietnam
Conflict.
5. The director shall furnish each former prisoner of war obtaining a set of license
plates under the provisions of subsections 1 to 4 of this section special plates which shall have
the words "FORMER P.O.W." on the license plates in preference to the words "SHOW-ME
STATE" as provided in section 301.130 in a form prescribed by the advisory committee
established in section 301.129. Such license plates shall be made with fully reflective
material, shall have a white background with a blue and red configuration at the discretion of
the advisory committee established in section 301.129, shall be clearly visible at night, and
shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed by section 301.130.
6. Registration certificates and license plates issued under the provisions of this
section shall not be transferable to any other person except that any registered co-owner of the
motor vehicle will be entitled to operate the motor vehicle for the duration of the year licensed
in the event of the death of the qualified former prisoner of war.
7. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 6 of this section to the contrary,
the surviving spouse of a former prisoner of war who has not remarried and who has been
issued license plates described in subsection 5 of this section shall be entitled to transfer such
license plates to the motor vehicle of the surviving spouse and receive annually one certificate
of registration and one set of license plates or other evidence of registration as provided in
section 301.130 as if a former prisoner of war until remarriage. There shall be no fee charged
for the transfer of such license plates.
(2) The department of revenue shall promulgate rules for the obtaining of a set of
license plates described in subsection 5 of this section by the surviving spouse of the former
prisoner of war when such license plates are not issued prior to the death of the former
prisoner of war. The surviving spouse shall be entitled to receive annually one certificate of
registration and one set of license plates or other evidence of registration as provided in

HB 2969 19
section 301.130 as if a former prisoner of war until remarriage. There shall be no fee charged
for the license plates issued pursuant to this subdivision.
301.800. 1. Any motor vehicle assembled by a two- or four-year institution of higher
education exclusively utilizing solar power and built to compete in a national competition
organized to foster interest in solar energy shall be registered and titled by the director of
revenue, other laws regulating licensing of motor vehicles to the contrary notwithstanding.
2. Such institution shall file an application in a form prescribed by the director,
verified by affidavit, that such vehicle meets the requirements of subsection 1 of this section.
3. The plate issued by the director shall be the collegiate plate of the institution and
shall display the term "solar" in a manner prescribed by the director.
4. The institution shall pay the applicable fees as determined by the director.
5. Such motor vehicle shall be exempt from the [inspections required by section
307.350 and] inspection required under section 643.315 and shall only be operated on the
streets and highways with the approval of the institution of higher education.
307.350. 1. The owner of every commercial motor vehicle, as defined in section
301.010; [which is required to be registered in this state, except:
(1) Motor vehicles having less than one hundred fifty thousand miles, for the ten-year
period following their model year of manufacture, excluding] prior salvage [vehicles] vehicle,
as defined in section 301.010, immediately following a rebuilding process; and [vehicles]
motor vehicle subject to the provisions of section 307.380[;
(2) Those motor vehicles which are engaged in interstate commerce and are
proportionately registered in this state with the Missouri highway reciprocity commission,
although the owner may request that such vehicle be inspected by an official inspection
station, and a peace officer may stop and inspect such vehicles to determine whether the
mechanical condition is in compliance with the safety regulations established by the United
States Department of Transportation; and
(3) Historic motor vehicles registered pursuant to section 301.131;
(4) Vehicles registered in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds for a period of less
than twelve months;] shall submit such [vehicles] vehicleto a biennial inspection of [their] its
mechanism and equipment in accordance with the provisions of sections [307.350] 307.360to
307.390 and obtain a certificate of inspection and approval and a sticker, seal, or other device
from a duly authorized official inspection station. The inspection, except the inspection of
school buses which shall be made at the time provided in section 307.375, shall be made at
the time prescribed in the rules and regulations issued by the superintendent of the Missouri
state highway patrol; but the inspection of a vehicle shall not be made more than sixty days
prior to the date of application for registration or within sixty days of when a vehicle's
registration is transferred; however, if a vehicle was purchased from a motor vehicle dealer

HB 2969 20
and a valid inspection had been made within sixty days of the purchase date, the new owner
shall be able to utilize an inspection performed within ninety days prior to the application for
registration or transfer. Any vehicle manufactured as an even-numbered model year vehicle
shall be inspected and approved pursuant to the safety inspection program established
pursuant to sections [307.350] 307.360 to 307.390 in each even-numbered calendar year and
any such vehicle manufactured as an odd-numbered model year vehicle shall be inspected and
approved pursuant to sections [307.350] 307.360 to 307.390 in each odd-numbered year. The
certificate of inspection and approval shall be a sticker, seal, or other device or combination
thereof, as the superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol prescribes by regulation
and shall be displayed upon the motor vehicle or trailer as prescribed by the regulations
established by him. The replacement of certificates of inspection and approval which are lost
or destroyed shall be made by the superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol under
regulations prescribed by him.
2. For the purpose of obtaining an inspection only, it shall be lawful to operate a
vehicle over the most direct route between the owner's usual place of residence and an
inspection station of such owner's choice, notwithstanding the fact that the vehicle does not
have a current state registration license. It shall also be lawful to operate such a vehicle from
an inspection station to another place where repairs may be made and to return the vehicle to
the inspection station notwithstanding the absence of a current state registration license.
3. No person whose motor vehicle was duly inspected and approved as provided in
this section shall be required to have the same motor vehicle again inspected and approved for
the sole reason that such person wishes to obtain a set of any special personalized license
plates available pursuant to section 301.144 or a set of any license plates available pursuant to
section 301.142, prior to the expiration date of such motor vehicle's current registration.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 307.390, violation of this section shall
be deemed an infraction.
307.360. 1. The superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol shall issue
permits and written instructions to official inspection stations and shall furnish forms and
certificates for the [inspection of brakes, lighting equipment, signaling devices, steering
mechanisms, horns, mirrors, windshield wipers, tires, wheels, exhaust system, glazing, air
pollution control devices, fuel system, and any other safety equipment required by the state.
In no instance will road testing of a vehicle be considered a part of the inspection procedure]
certification of manufacturer's identification numbers and odometer readings for
vehicles presented for inspection.
2. The superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol shall prescribe the
standards and equipment necessary for an official inspection station and the qualifications for
persons who conduct the inspections, and no applicant may be approved to operate an official

HB 2969 21
inspection station until the applicant meets the standards and has the required equipment and
qualified inspectors as prescribed. The superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol
shall establish standards and procedures to be followed in the making of inspections required
by sections [307.350] 307.360 to 307.390 and shall prescribe rules and regulations for the
operation of the stations.
3. (1) The application for permit as an official inspection station shall be made to the
superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol on a form furnished by the
superintendent. The fee for a permit to operate an official inspection station shall be ten
dollars per year and each permit shall be renewed annually on the date of issue. All fees shall
be payable to the director of revenue and shall be deposited by him in the state treasury to the
credit of the state highway fund.
(2) The application shall set forth the name under which applicant transacts or intends
to transact business, the location of the applicant's place of business and such other
information as the superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol may require. If the
applicant has or intends to have more than one place of business within the state, a separate
application shall be made for each place of business. If the applicant is a partnership, the
application shall set forth the names of the partners; if a corporation, the names of the officers
shall be shown. The application shall be signed and verified by oath or affirmation of the
owner or an authorized officer or partner.
(3) Each location which fulfills the superintendent of the Missouri state highway
patrol's requirements and whose owners, proprietors and employees comply with the
superintendent's regulations and qualifications shall be designated as an official inspection
station and the applicant issued a certificate. The superintendent of the Missouri state
highway patrol shall investigate all applicants for inspection station permits to determine
whether or not the premises, equipment and personnel meet the requirements prescribed by
him.
(4) Any automobile mechanic who has had at least one year of practical experience as
an automotive mechanic or any person who has successfully completed a course of vocational
instruction in automotive mechanics from a generally recognized educational institution,
either public or private, and who has demonstrated the knowledge and ability to conduct an
inspection in compliance with the regulations established by the superintendent of the
Missouri state highway patrol may be issued a permit to conduct inspections at any official
inspection station. No person without a valid permit shall conduct any part of an inspection[,
except a person without a valid permit may assist in the inspection of a vehicle by operating
the vehicle's lighting equipment and signaling devices. The superintendent of the Missouri
state highway patrol may require a mechanic to be reexamined at any time to determine the
mechanic's knowledge and ability to conduct an inspection. If the mechanic fails the

HB 2969 22
reexamination or refuses to be reexamined, the permit issued to the mechanic shall be
suspended until the mechanic passes the examination but under no circumstances can the
mechanic again be tested until a period of thirty days has elapsed]. No fee shall be charged
for the permit and the permit shall remain valid for a period of three years from the date of
issue or until suspended or revoked by the superintendent of the Missouri state highway
patrol.
[(5) The superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol may issue a private
official inspection station permit to any association, person, partnership, corporation and/or
subsidiary corporation, and governmental entity having registered or titled in his, her or its
name in this state one or more vehicles of the type required to be inspected by section
307.350, or who maintains such vehicles under a written maintenance agreement of at least
one year's duration and who maintains approved inspection facilities and has qualified
personnel; but separate permits must be obtained for separate facilities of the same
association, person, partnership, corporation and/or subsidiary corporation, or governmental
entity. Such private stations shall inspect only vehicles registered or to be registered, titled or
to be titled or maintained in the name of the person or organization described on the
application for permit. No fee shall be charged for a permit issued to a governmental entity.]
4. (1) The superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol shall supervise and
cause inspections to be made of the official inspection stations and inspecting personnel and if
the superintendent finds that the provisions of sections [307.350] 307.360 to 307.390 or the
regulations issued pursuant to sections [307.350] 307.360 to 307.390 are not being complied
with, or that the business of an official inspection station, in connection with corrections,
adjustments, repairs or inspection of vehicles is being improperly conducted, the
superintendent shall suspend or revoke the permit of the station for a period of not less
than thirty days or more than one year and require the immediate surrender and return of the
permit, together with all official forms and certificates of inspection and approval. If the
superintendent finds that an inspector has violated any of the provisions of sections [307.350]
307.360 to 307.390 or the regulations issued pursuant to sections [307.350] 307.360 to
307.390, the superintendent shall suspend or revoke the inspector's permit for a period of not
less than thirty days nor more than one year. If a station operator or if an inspector violates
any of the provisions of sections [307.350] 307.360 to 307.390, he or she is subject to
prosecution as provided in section 307.390.
(2) The suspension or revocation of a station permit or of an inspector's permit shall
be in writing to the operator, inspector, or the person in charge of the station. Before
suspending or revoking either of the permits, the superintendent shall serve notice in writing
by certified mail or by personal service to the permittee at the permittee's address of record
giving the permittee the opportunity to appear in the office of the superintendent on a stated

HB 2969 23
date, not less than ten nor more than thirty days after the mailing or service of the notice, for a
hearing to show cause why the permittee's permit should not be suspended or revoked. An
inspection station owner or an inspector may appear in person or by counsel in the office of
the superintendent to show cause why the proposed suspension or revocation is in error, or to
present any other facts or testimony that would bear on the final decision of the
superintendent. If the permittee or the permittee's agent does not appear on the stated day
after receipt of notice, it shall be presumed that the permittee admits the allegations of fact
contained in the hearing notification letter. The decision of the superintendent may in such
case be based upon the written reports submitted by the superintendent's officers. The order
of the superintendent, specifying his findings of fact and conclusions of law, shall be
considered final immediately after receipt of notice thereof by the permittee.
(3) Any person whose permit is suspended or revoked or whose application for a
permit is denied may within ten days appeal the action as provided in chapter 536.
307.365. 1. No permit for an official inspection station shall be assigned or
transferred or used at any location other than therein designated and every permit shall be
posted in a conspicuous place at the location designated. The superintendent of the Missouri
state highway patrol shall design and furnish each official inspection station, at no cost, one
official sign made of metal or other durable material to be displayed in a conspicuous location
to designate the station as an official inspection station. Additional signs may be obtained by
an official inspection station for a fee equal to the cost to the state. Each inspection station
shall also be supplied with one or more posters which must be displayed in a conspicuous
location at the place of inspection and which informs the public that required repairs or
corrections need not be made at the inspection station.
2. No person operating an official inspection station pursuant to the provisions of
sections [307.350] 307.360 to 307.390 may issue a certificate of inspection and approval for
any vehicle except upon an official form furnished by the superintendent of the Missouri state
highway patrol for that purpose [and only after inspecting the vehicle and determining that its
brakes, lighting equipment, signaling devices, steering mechanisms, horns, mirrors,
windshield wipers, tires, wheels, exhaust system, glazing, air pollution control devices,
fuel system and any other safety equipment as required by the state are in proper condition
and adjustment to be operated upon the public highways of this state with safety to the driver
or operator, other occupants therein, as well as other persons and property upon the highways,
as provided by sections 307.350 to 307.390 and the regulations prescribed by the
superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol. Brakes may be inspected for safety by
means of visual inspection or computerized brake testing]. No person operating an official
inspection station shall furnish, loan, give or sell a certificate of inspection and approval to
any other person except those entitled to receive it under provisions of sections [307.350]

HB 2969 24
307.360 to 307.390. [No person shall have in such person's possession any certificate of
inspection and approval and/or inspection sticker with knowledge that the certificate and/or
inspection sticker has been illegally purchased, stolen or counterfeited.]
3. The superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol may require officially
designated stations to furnish reports upon forms furnished by the superintendent for that
purpose as the superintendent considers reasonably necessary for the proper and efficient
administration of sections [307.350] 307.360 to 307.390.
4. [If, upon inspection, defects or unsafe conditions are found, the owner may correct
them or shall have them corrected at any place the owner chooses within twenty days after the
defect or unsafe condition is found, and shall have the right to remove the vehicle to such
place for correction, but before the vehicle is operated thereafter upon the public highways of
this state, a certificate of inspection and approval must be obtained. The inspecting personnel
of the official inspection station must inform the owner that the corrections need not be made
at the inspection station.
5.] A fee, not to exceed twelve dollars, as determined by each official inspection
station, may be charged by an official inspection station for each official inspection including
the issuance of the certificate of inspection [and approval, sticker, seal or other device and a
total fee, not to exceed ten dollars, as determined by each official inspection station, may be
charged for an official inspection of a trailer or motorcycle, which shall include the issuance
of the certificate of inspection and approval, sticker, seal or other device]. Such fee shall be
conspicuously posted on the premises of each such official inspection station. [No owner
shall be charged an additional inspection fee upon having corrected defects or unsafe
conditions found in an inspection completed within the previous twenty consecutive days,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, if such follow-up inspection is made by the
station making the initial inspection. Every inspection for which a fee is charged shall be a
complete inspection, and upon completion of the inspection, if any defects are found the
owner of the vehicle shall be furnished a list of the defects and a receipt for the fee paid for
the inspection. If the owner of a vehicle decides to have any necessary repairs or corrections
made at the official inspection station, the owner shall be furnished a written estimate of the
cost of such repairs before such repairs or corrections are made by the official inspection
station. The written estimate shall have plainly written upon it that the owner understands
that the corrections need not be made by the official inspection station and shall have a
signature line for the owner. The owner must sign below the statement on the signature line
before any repairs are made.
6. Certificates of inspection and approval, sticker, seal or other device shall be
purchased by the official inspection stations from the superintendent of the Missouri state
highway patrol. The superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol shall collect a fee of

HB 2969 25
one dollar and fifty cents for each certificate of inspection, sticker, seal or other device issued
to the official inspection stations, except that no charge shall be made for certificates of
inspection, sticker, seal or other device issued to official inspection stations operated by
governmental entities. All fees collected shall be deposited in the state treasury with one
dollar of each fee collected credited to the state highway fund and, for the purpose of
administering and enforcing the state motor vehicle laws and traffic regulations, fifty cents
credited to the "Highway Patrol Inspection Fund" which is hereby created. The moneys
collected and deposited in the highway patrol inspection fund shall be expended subject to
appropriations by the general assembly for the administration and enforcement of sections
307.350 to 307.390 by the Missouri state highway patrol. The unexpended balance in the
fund at the end of each biennium exceeding the amount of the appropriations from the fund
for the first two fiscal years shall be transferred to the state road fund, and the provisions of
section 33.080, relating to the transfer of funds to the general revenue fund at the end of the
biennium, shall not apply to the fund.
7.] 5. The owner or operator of any inspection station who discontinues operation
during the period that a station permit is valid or whose station permit is suspended or
revoked shall return all official signs and posters [and any current unused inspection stickers,
seals or other devices] to the superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol and shall
receive a full refund on request except for official signs and posters, provided the request is
made during the calendar year or within sixty days thereafter in the manner prescribed by the
superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol. [Stations which have a valid permit shall
exchange unused previous year issue inspection stickers and/or decals for an identical number
of current year issue, provided the unused stickers and/or decals are submitted for exchange
not later than April thirtieth of the current calendar year, in the manner prescribed by the
superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol.
8.] 6. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 307.390 to the contrary, a violation of
this section shall be a class C misdemeanor.
[9.] 7. The owner or operator of any inspection station shall maintain liability
insurance at all times to cover possible damage to vehicles during the inspection process.
307.370. 1. No person shall represent in any manner any place as an official
inspection station unless the station is operated under a valid permit issued by the
superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol.
2. No person unless then holding a valid permit shall issue a certificate of inspection
[and approval, sticker, seal or other device].
3. No person shall make, issue or knowingly use any imitation or counterfeit of an
official certificate of inspection[, sticker, seal or other device].

HB 2969 26
4. No person shall display or cause or permit to be displayed upon any vehicle any
certificate of inspection and approval[, sticker, seal or other device] knowing the same to be
fictitious or issued for another vehicle or issued without an inspection having been made.
307.375. 1. The owner of every bus used to transport children to or from school in
addition to any other inspection required by law shall submit the vehicle to an official school
bus inspection station, and obtain a certificate of inspection, sticker, seal or other device
annually, but the inspection of the vehicle shall not be made more than sixty days prior to
operating the vehicle during the school year. The inspection shall[, in addition to the
inspection of the mechanism and equipment required for all motor vehicles under the
provisions of sections 307.350 to 307.390,] include a determination that the brakes,
lighting equipment, signaling devices, steering mechanisms, horns, mirrors, windshield
wipers, tires, wheels, exhaust system, glazing, air pollution control devices, and fuel
system of the bus are in proper condition and, in addition, include an inspection to
ascertain that the following items are correctly fitted, adjusted, and in good working
condition:
(1) All mirrors, including crossview, inside, and outside;
(2) The front and rear warning flashers;
(3) The stop signal arm;
(4) The crossing control arm on public school buses required to have them pursuant to
section 304.050;
(5) The rear bumper to determine that it is flush with the bus so that hitching of rides
cannot occur;
(6) The exhaust tailpipe shall be flush with or may extend not more than two inches
beyond the perimeter of the body or bumper;
(7) The emergency doors and exits to determine them to be unlocked and easily
opened as required;
(8) The lettering and signing on the front, side and rear of the bus;
(9) The service door;
(10) The step treads;
(11) The aisle mats or aisle runners;
(12) The emergency equipment which shall include as a minimum a first aid kit,
flares or fuses, and a fire extinguisher;
(13) The seats, including a determination that they are securely fastened to the floor;
(14) The emergency door buzzer;
(15) All hand hold grips;
(16) The interior glazing of the bus.

HB 2969 27
2. In addition to the inspection required by subsection 1 of this section, the Missouri
state highway patrol shall conduct an inspection after February first of each school year of all
vehicles required to be marked as school buses under section 304.050. This inspection shall
be conducted by the Missouri highway patrol in cooperation with the department of
elementary and secondary education and shall include, as a minimum, items in subsection 1
of this section and the following:
(1) The driver seat belts;
(2) The heating and defrosting systems;
(3) The reflectors;
(4) The bus steps;
(5) The aisles;
(6) The frame.
3. If, upon inspection, conditions which violate the standards in subsection 2 of this
section are found, the owner or operator shall have them corrected in ten days and notify the
superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol or those persons authorized by the
superintendent. If the defects or unsafe conditions found constitute an immediate danger, the
bus shall not be used until corrections are made and the superintendent of the Missouri state
highway patrol or those persons authorized by the superintendent are notified.
4. The Missouri highway patrol may inspect any school bus at any time and if such
inspection reveals a deficiency affecting the safe operation of the bus, the provisions of
subsection 3 of this section shall be applicable.
5. [Notwithstanding the provisions of section 307.390 to the contrary,] A violation of
this section shall be a class C misdemeanor.
6. The superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol shall prescribe the
standards and equipment necessary for an official school bus inspection station and the
qualifications for persons who conduct the inspections. The Missouri state highway
patrol shall establish standards and procedures to be followed when conducting the
inspections required under this section and shall prescribe rules and regulations for the
operation of the school bus inspection stations.
307.385. The superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol may notify the
director of revenue and the director of revenue shall suspend the registration of any vehicle
which the superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol determines, after a written
notice, is not equipped as required by law or for which a certificate required by sections
[307.350] 307.360 to 307.390 has not been obtained.
307.390. 1. Any person who violates any provision of sections [307.350] 307.360 to
307.390 is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished as provided by
law.

HB 2969 28
2. The superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol may assign qualified
persons who are not highway patrol officers to investigate and enforce motor vehicle safety
inspection laws and regulations pursuant to sections [307.350] 307.360 to 307.390 and
sections 643.300 to 643.355. A person assigned by the superintendent pursuant to the
authority granted by this subsection shall be designated a motor vehicle inspector and shall
have limited powers to issue a uniform complaint and summons for a violation of the motor
vehicle inspection laws and regulations. A motor vehicle inspector shall not have authority to
exercise the power granted in this subsection until such inspector successfully completes
training provided by, and to the satisfaction of, the superintendent.
643.303. 1. Beginning September 1, 2007, emissions inspections required by sections
643.300 to 643.355 shall be conducted through a decentralized emissions program that meets
the requirements of this section. Prior to September 1, 2007, the air conservation commission
shall develop a decentralized emissions inspection program that allows official inspection
stations to conduct on-board diagnostic emission inspections of 1996 model year and newer
motor vehicles equipped with on-board diagnostic systems meeting the federal Environmental
Protection Agency On-Board Diagnostics II (OBDII) standards. The decentralized emissions
inspection program shall, at a minimum, provide for the following:
(1) The periodic inspection of certain motor vehicles as required under section
643.315;
(2) The certification and operation of official emissions inspection stations and the
licensing of emission inspectors;
(3) The testing of motor vehicles through on-board diagnostic testing technologies;
(4) The training, certification, and supervision of emission inspectors and other
personnel; and
(5) Procedures for certifying test results and for reporting and maintaining relevant
data records.
2. In addition to any other criteria established by the commission under section
643.320 or by rule, the decentralized emissions inspection program shall allow any official
inspection station located in an area described in subsection 1 of section 643.305 otherwise
qualified by the Missouri state highway patrol to conduct motor vehicle [safety] inspections
under section 307.360 to conduct on-board diagnostic emission inspections. Any motor
vehicle [safety] inspection station that desires to conduct emissions inspections shall submit
an application for a certificate of authorization to the commission as provided for under
section 643.320. Other individuals, corporations, or entities [that do not conduct motor
vehicle safety inspections] may conduct emission inspections provided they meet the
qualifications set forth in sections 643.300 to 643.355 and [the] rules promulgated by the
commission. Applications shall be made upon a form designated by the commission and

HB 2969 29
shall contain such information as may be required by the commission. A certificate of
authorization issued under section 643.320 to conduct emission inspections shall be issued
only after the commission has made a determination that the applicant's proposed inspection
station will be properly equipped, has the necessary licensed emission inspectors to conduct
inspections, and meets all other requirements of sections 643.300 to 643.355 or rules
promulgated to carry out the provisions of those sections.
3. The decentralized emissions inspection program shall allow any official emissions
inspection station that is certified to conduct an on-board diagnostic emission inspection
under sections 643.300 to 643.355 to repair motor vehicles in order to bring such vehicles into
compliance with sections 643.300 to 643.355, if such station and personnel meet the
qualifications to conduct emission repairs as set forth in sections 643.300 to 643.355. An
official emission inspection station may elect to be an emissions test-only station or may elect
to conduct both emission inspections and repairs.
4. The commission is authorized to begin certification of official emissions
inspection stations prior to September 1, 2007, in order to implement the decentralized
emissions inspection program. Prior to January 1, 2007, the department of natural resources
shall issue a report to the general assembly and the governor regarding the progress of
implementing the decentralized emissions inspection program. The report shall include, but
not be limited to, a summary describing how many inspection stations or individuals the
department expects to participate in the program and how many inspection stations or
individuals will be qualified by September 1, 2007, to conduct such emissions inspections.
5. The commission may, as a part of implementing the decentralized emissions
inspection program, use remote sensing devices to collect information regarding the vehicle
fleet emissions characteristics and registration compliance within the area described in
subsection 1 of section 643.305. The decentralized emissions inspection program established
by the commission may also include a clean screen program that utilizes remote sensing
devices. Owners of eligible vehicles who comply with clean screen/remote sensing
procedures shall be deemed to have complied with the mandatory inspection requirements for
the next inspection cycle. As used in this subsection, the term "clean screen program" shall
mean a procedure or system that utilizes remote sensing technologies to determine whether a
motor vehicle has acceptable emission levels and then allows the motor vehicle owner to
bypass the emissions inspection test required under section 643.315.
6. The decentralized emissions inspection program may include a gas cap pressure
test and a visual inspection component[, and such tests may be included as part of the motor
vehicle safety inspection test under section 307.350].

HB 2969 30
7. As used in sections 643.300 to 643.355, "decentralized emissions inspection
program" means an emissions inspection program under which a certified emissions inspector
conducts emissions inspection testing at an official inspection station.
8. The decentralized emission inspection program shall satisfy the requirements
established by regulation of the United States Environmental Protection Agency.
9. The decentralized emissions inspection program established by the commission
and sections 643.300 to 643.355 shall not be construed to be a new program as described in
section 23.253, and the decentralized emissions inspection program shall not be subject to the
sunset mandate prescribed by sections 23.250 to 23.298.
10. No later than July 1, 2007, the department of natural resources and the Missouri
highway patrol shall enter into an interagency agreement covering all aspects of the
administration and enforcement of sections 643.300 to 643.355.
11. No later than July 1, 2007, the air conservation commission shall promulgate rules
for the implementation of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly under chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2006, shall be
invalid and void.
12. Prior to September 1, 2007, the department of natural resources shall actively
promote participation in the decentralized emissions inspection program among qualified
motor vehicle dealers, service stations, and other individuals. After the implementation of the
decentralized emission inspection program, the department shall monitor participation in such
program. In determining whether there are a sufficient number of individuals conducting
motor vehicle emission inspections under the decentralized program, the department shall
attempt to ensure, through promotional efforts, that no more than twenty percent of all
persons residing in the affected nonattainment area reside farther than five miles from the
nearest inspection station.
643.315. 1. Except as provided in sections 643.300 to 643.355, all motor vehicles
which are domiciled, registered or primarily operated in an area for which the commission
has established a motor vehicle emissions inspection program pursuant to sections 643.300 to
643.355 shall be inspected and approved prior to sale or transfer; provided that, if such
vehicle is inspected and approved prior to sale or transfer, such vehicle shall not be subject to
another emissions inspection for ninety days after the date of sale or transfer of such vehicle.
In addition, any such vehicle manufactured as an even-numbered model year vehicle shall be

HB 2969 31
inspected and approved under the emissions inspection program established pursuant to
sections 643.300 to 643.355 in each even-numbered calendar year and any such vehicle
manufactured as an odd-numbered model year vehicle shall be inspected and approved under
the emissions inspection program established pursuant to sections 643.300 to 643.355 in each
odd-numbered calendar year. All motor vehicles subject to the inspection requirements of
sections 643.300 to 643.355 shall display a valid emissions inspection sticker, and when
applicable, a valid emissions inspection certificate shall be presented at the time of
registration or registration renewal of such motor vehicle. The department of revenue shall
require evidence of [the safety and] emission inspection and approval required by this section
in issuing the motor vehicle annual registration in conformity with the procedure required by
[sections 307.350 to 307.390 and] sections 643.300 to 643.355. The director of revenue may
verify that a successful [safety and] emissions inspection was completed via electronic means.
2. The inspection requirement of subsection 1 of this section shall apply to all motor
vehicles except:
(1) Motor vehicles with a manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating in excess of
eight thousand five hundred pounds;
(2) Motorcycles and motortricycles if such vehicles are exempted from the motor
vehicle emissions inspection under federal regulation and approved by the commission by
rule;
(3) Model year vehicles manufactured prior to 1996;
(4) Vehicles which are powered exclusively by electric or hydrogen power or by fuels
other than gasoline which are exempted from the motor vehicle emissions inspection under
federal regulation and approved by the commission by rule;
(5) Motor vehicles registered in an area subject to the inspection requirements of
sections 643.300 to 643.355 which are domiciled and operated exclusively in an area of the
state not subject to the inspection requirements of sections 643.300 to 643.355, but only if the
owner of such vehicle presents to the department an affidavit that the vehicle will be operated
exclusively in an area of the state not subject to the inspection requirements of sections
643.300 to 643.355 for the next twenty-four months, and the owner applies for and receives a
waiver which shall be presented at the time of registration or registration renewal;
(6) New and unused motor vehicles, of model years of the current calendar year and
of any calendar year within two years of such calendar year, which have an odometer reading
of less than six thousand miles at the time of original sale by a motor vehicle manufacturer or
licensed motor vehicle dealer to the first user;
(7) Historic motor vehicles registered pursuant to section 301.131;
(8) School buses;

HB 2969 32
(9) Heavy-duty diesel-powered vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating in excess
of eight thousand five hundred pounds;
(10) New motor vehicles that have not been previously titled and registered, for the
four-year period following their model year of manufacture[, provided the odometer reading
for such motor vehicles are under forty thousand miles at their first required biennial safety
inspection conducted under sections 307.350 to 307.390; otherwise such motor vehicles shall
be subject to the emissions inspection requirements of subsection 1 of this section during the
same period that the biennial safety inspection is conducted];
(11) Motor vehicles that are driven fewer than twelve thousand miles between
biennial [safety inspections] registration periods; and
(12) Qualified plug-in electric drive vehicles. For the purposes of this section,
"qualified plug-in electric drive vehicle" shall mean a plug-in electric drive vehicle that is
made by a manufacturer, has not been modified from original manufacturer specifications,
and can operate solely on electric power and is capable of recharging its battery from an on-
board generation source and an off-board electricity source.
3. The commission may, by rule, allow inspection reciprocity with other states having
equivalent or more stringent testing and waiver requirements than those established pursuant
to sections 643.300 to 643.355.
4. (1) At the time of sale, a licensed motor vehicle dealer, as defined in section
301.550, may choose to sell a motor vehicle subject to the inspection requirements of sections
643.300 to 643.355 either:
(a) With prior inspection and approval as provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection; or
(b) Without prior inspection and approval as provided in subdivision (3) of this
subsection.
(2) If the dealer chooses to sell the vehicle with prior inspection and approval, the
dealer shall disclose, in writing, prior to sale, whether the vehicle obtained approval by
meeting the emissions standards established pursuant to sections 643.300 to 643.355 or by
obtaining a waiver pursuant to section 643.335. A vehicle sold pursuant to this subdivision by
a licensed motor vehicle dealer shall be inspected and approved within the one hundred
twenty days immediately preceding the date of sale, and, for the purpose of registration of
such vehicle, such inspection shall be considered timely.
(3) If the dealer chooses to sell the vehicle without prior inspection and approval, the
purchaser may return the vehicle within ten days of the date of purchase, provided that the
vehicle has no more than one thousand additional miles since the time of sale, if the vehicle
fails, upon inspection, to meet the emissions standards specified by the commission and the
dealer shall have the vehicle inspected and approved without the option for a waiver of the

HB 2969 33
emissions standard and return the vehicle to the purchaser with a valid emissions certificate
and sticker within five working days or the purchaser and dealer may enter into any other
mutually acceptable agreement. If the dealer chooses to sell the vehicle without prior
inspection and approval, the dealer shall disclose conspicuously on the sales contract and bill
of sale that the purchaser has the option to return the vehicle within ten days, provided that the
vehicle has no more than one thousand additional miles since the time of sale, to have the
dealer repair the vehicle and provide an emissions certificate and sticker within five working
days if the vehicle fails, upon inspection, to meet the emissions standards established by the
commission, or enter into any mutually acceptable agreement with the dealer. A violation of
this subdivision shall be an unlawful practice as defined in section 407.020. [No emissions
inspection shall be required pursuant to sections 643.300 to 643.360 for the sale of any motor
vehicle which may be sold without a certificate of inspection and approval, as provided
pursuant to subsection 2 of section 307.380.]
[307.353. Other provisions of law notwithstanding, no person shall be
required to have a biennial vehicle inspection during a registration period
which exceeds two years. The inspection required at the beginning of the
registration period shall be valid for the entire registration period.]
[307.355. 1. No state registration license to operate the type of vehicle
required to be inspected by section 307.350 may be transferred or issued
during a biennial registration year in which the vehicle is required to be
inspected unless the application is accompanied by a certificate of inspection
and approval issued no more than sixty days prior to the date of application, or
in the case of school buses, which will be required to be inspected annually as
provided in section 307.375, except:
(1) The director of revenue may transfer or issue a state registration
license to the type of vehicle required to be inspected by section 307.350
without a certificate of inspection and approval accompanying the application
if the director has satisfactory evidence that the vehicle was not in the state of
Missouri at any time during the sixty days prior to the date of application;
however, the owner of every such vehicle must submit the vehicle for
inspection and obtain a certificate of inspection and approval within ten days
after the vehicle is first returned to the state of Missouri;
(2) The director of revenue shall renew a vehicle's registration license
without a certificate of inspection and approval accompanying the application
if satisfactory documentary evidence is presented at the time of application
that the license being renewed was properly transferred within a six-month
period prior to the expiration of the license being renewed or that the vehicle
for which the registration is being issued was issued a registration for a period
of less than one year for the registration period just expiring.
2. If due to interstate operation a commercial motor vehicle as defined
in section 301.010 or a trailer of the type required to be inspected is required to
obtain full fee registration in this and any other state during the same calendar

HB 2969 34
year, no Missouri certificate of inspection and approval is required if the
vehicle bears evidence that a current valid inspection sticker or decal was
issued by such other state in which the vehicle is registered; provided that the
sticker or decal issued by such other state is valid for the registration period in
this state.
3. After a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 301.010 has
been registered for the current year, no certificate of inspection and approval is
required when a local commercial motor vehicle license is changed to a
beyond-local commercial motor vehicle license or when the licensed gross
weight is changed during the licensed period.]
[307.380. 1. Every vehicle of the type required to be inspected upon
having been involved in an accident and when so directed by a police officer
must be inspected and an official certificate of inspection and approval,
sticker, seal or other device be obtained for such vehicle before it is again
operated on the highways of this state. At the seller's expense every used
motor vehicle of the type required to be inspected by section 307.350 shall
immediately prior to sale be fully inspected regardless of any current
certificate of inspection and approval, and an appropriate new certificate of
inspection and approval, sticker, seal or other device shall be obtained.
2. Nothing contained in the provisions of this section shall be
construed to prohibit a dealer or any other person from selling a vehicle
without a certificate of inspection and approval if the vehicle is sold for junk,
salvage, or for rebuilding, or for vehicles sold at public auction or from dealer
to dealer. The purchaser of any vehicle which is purchased for junk, salvage,
or for rebuilding shall give to the seller an affidavit, on a form prescribed by
the superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol, stating that the vehicle
is being purchased for one of the reasons stated herein. No vehicle of the type
required to be inspected by section 307.350 which is purchased as junk,
salvage, or for rebuilding shall again be registered in this state until the owner
has submitted the vehicle for inspection and obtained an official certificate of
inspection and approval, sticker, seal or other device for such vehicle.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 307.390, violation of this
section shall be deemed an infraction.]
[307.402. All state agencies owning motor vehicles shall be
responsible for obtaining an inspection of each of their vehicle's mechanism
and equipment in accordance with the provisions of sections 307.350 to
307.402 and obtaining a certificate of inspection and approval and a sticker,
seal or other device from a duly authorized official inspection station.]
Section B. Section A of this act shall become effective January 1, 2027.
✔